Utah statutes.
58-26a-601.   Ownership of statements, records, schedules, working papers,
and memoranda made by licensee.
(1)  All statements, records, schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by
a licensee under this chapter, incident to or in the course of professional
service to a client, are the property of the licensee, in the absence of any
express agreement between the licensee and the client to the contrary.
(2)  A licensee may not sell, trade, or bequeath statements, records,
schedules, working papers, or memoranda without the consent of the client or
the client's personal representative or assignee to anyone other than another
licensee or one or more surviving partners or shareholders or new partners or
shareholders of the licensee or any combined or merged CPA firm or successors-
in-interest to the CPA firm.
